Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-902
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-903 to 38-905 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 254.